Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-810 Claims not due and
contingent or unliquidated claims. (a) If a claim which will become due
at a future time or a contingent or unliquidated claim becomes due or certain
before the distribution of the estate, and if the claim has been allowed or
established by a proceeding, it is paid in the same manner as presently due and
absolute claims of the same class.

(b) In other cases the personal representative
or, on petition of the personal representative or the claimant in a special
proceeding for the purpose, the court may provide for payment as follows:

(1) If the claimant consents, the claimant may be
paid the present or agreed value of the claim, taking any uncertainty into
account; and

(2) Arrangement for future payment, or possible
payment, on the happening of the contingency or on liquidation may be made by
creating a trust, giving a mortgage, obtaining a bond or security from a
distributee, or otherwise. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Closing estates, arrangements, see HPR rule 64.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next